Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.030

Laws applicable.

Cities organized under the commission form have all the powers of cities of the second class and shall be governed by the statutes applicable to cities of that class to the extent to which they are appropriate and not in conflict with provisions specifically applicable to cities organized under the commission form.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.030. Prior: (i) 1911 c 116 s 11, part; RRS s 9100, part. (ii) 1911 c 116 s 4, part; RRS s 9093, part.]

NOTES:

Second-class cities: Chapter 35.23 RCW.